Illinois, session 104th, HB4800.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Local 5Government Building Permit Act. 6    Section 5. Applicability. 7    (a) This Act only applies to units of local government 8that require a person to obtain a permit from the unit of local 9government before the person may construct a building within 10the unit of local government.11    (b) This Act shall not be construed to supersede any 12health, safety, environmental, or other building code 13requirements. 14    Section 10. Building permit approval. 15    (a) A unit of local government must comply with the 16following timelines:17        (1) Within 30 days of the submission of the 18    application for the building permit, the unit of local 19    government must complete an initial completeness review to 20    ensure the application includes the required information. 21    If information is missing, then the unit of local 22    government must inform the requester that additional   HB4800- 2 -LRB104 17982 RTM 31419 b1    information is required.2        (2) Once the application is deemed complete, the unit 3    of local government shall issue a decision on the building 4    permit application within 60 days for a single-family home 5    project, 90 days for a multifamily housing project with 6    between 2 and 29 units, and 120 days for a project that is 7    30 or more units.8    (b) If a unit of local government fails to comply with the 9timelines established in this Section, then the building 10permit is automatically approved by operation of law, unless 11the proposed building project violates published building or 12zoning codes. 13    Section 15. Publishing requirements.14    (a) A unit of local government must publish the following 15information on its public-facing website:16        (1) the average amount of time it takes the unit of 17    local government to process a building permit;18        (2) common reasons building permits are denied or 19    delayed;20        (3) the number of building permit applications the 21    unit of local government received in the preceding year;22        (4) the number of building permit applications the 23    unit of local government approved in the preceding year; 24    and25        (5) the number of building permit applications the   HB4800- 3 -LRB104 17982 RTM 31419 b1    unit of local government denied in the preceding year.2    (b) This Section does not apply to a unit of local 3government that does not have a public facing website. 4    Section 20. Permit fees. The fees that a unit of local 5government imposes to approve a building permit application 6may not exceed the actual cost the unit of local government 7incurs to review a building permit application. 8    Section 25. Appeals. If a unit of local government denies 9a person's building permit application, then the person may 10appeal the decision to the Building Permit Ombudsman. An 11appeal of a denied building permit application must be made 12within 60 days of receiving notice of the denial. 13    Section 30. The Department of Commerce and Economic 14Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois 15is amended by adding Section 605.1119 as follows: 16    (20 ILCS 605/605.1119 new)17    Sec. 605.1119. Building Permit Ombudsman.18    (a) The position of Building Permit Ombudsman is created 19within the Department.20    (b) The Building Permit Ombudsman shall receive, review, 21and resolve appeals brought under Section 25 of the Local 22Government Building Permit Act. The Building Permit Ombudsman   HB4800- 4 -LRB104 17982 RTM 31419 b1shall (i) examine the issues and the information provided by 2both parties; (ii) make findings of fact and conclusions of 3law; and (iii) issue a decision to the developer and the unit 4of local government in response to the appeal within 60 days 5after the Building Permit Ombudsman receives the appeal. The 6Building Permit Ombudsman's decision shall be binding upon 7both the developer and the unit of local government, subject 8to administrative review.9    (c) The Department may delegate additional 10responsibilities to the Building Permit Ombudsman. However, 11the Building Permit Ombudsman shall not consider matters that:12        (1) may constitute grounds for charges or complaints 13    under the Illinois Human Rights Act; or14        (2) that are brought before:15            (A) the Department of Human Rights or the Illinois 16        Human Rights Commission;17            (B) a department or body established by a county, 18        township, or municipality under an ordinance 19        prohibiting discrimination and established for the 20        purpose of investigating and adjudicating charges or 21        complaints of discrimination under the ordinance; or22            (C) a federal agency or commission that 23        administers and enforces federal anti-discrimination 24        laws and investigates and adjudicates charges or 25        complaints of discrimination.